DTC B1317 [MZ-CD 1.6 (Y6)]
id0102c3842200
DTC B1317 |
Fuel additive control module B+ voltage high |
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DETECTION CONDITION
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• The fuel additive control module monitors the supply voltage of battery positive terminal at fuel additive control module terminals 1 and 8. If the Fuel additive control module detected battery positive terminal voltage above 16 V, the fuel additive control module determines that the power supply system has malfunction.
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POSSIBLE CAUSE
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• Short to power circuit between generator connector terminal D and PCM connector terminal 107
• Generator malfunction
• Fuel additive control module and/or generator are poorly connected
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Diagnostic procedure
STEP |
INSPECTION |
ACTION |
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1
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VERIFY FREEZE FRAME DATA HAS BEEN RECORDED
• Has the FREEZE FRAME DATA been recorded?
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Yes
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Go to the next step.
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No
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Record the FREEZE FRAME DATA on the repair order, then go to the next step.
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2
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VERIFY RELATED REPAIR INFORMATION AVAILABILITY
• Verify related service repair information availability.
• Is any related repair information available?
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Yes
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Perform repair or diagnosis according to the available repair information.
• If the vehicle is not repaired, go to the next step.
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No
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Go to the next step.
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3
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INSPECT POOR CONNECTION OF GENERATOR CONNECTOR
• Turn the engine switch to off.
• Disconnect generator connector.
• Inspect for poor connection
(damaged, pulled-out terminals, corrosion, etc.).
• Is there a malfunction?
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Yes
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Repair or replace terminals, then go to Step 8.
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No
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Go to the next step.
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4
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CLASSIFY GENERATOR MALFUNCTION OR OTHER MALFUNCTION
• Turn the engine switch to the ON position (Engine off).
• Measure voltage between generator terminal D (wiring harness-side) and body ground.
• Is the voltage B+?
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Yes
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Go to the next step.
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No
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Malfunction at generator.
Go to Step 7.
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5
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INSPECT POOR CONNECTION OF PCM CONNECTOR
• Turn the engine switch to off.
• Disconnect PCM connector.
• Inspect for poor connection
(damaged, pulled-out terminals, corrosion, etc.).
• Is there a malfunction?
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Yes
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Repair or replace pins, then go to Step 8.
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No
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Go to the next step.
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6
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INSPECT GENERATOR CONTROL CIRCUIT FOR SHORT TO POWER
• Turn the engine switch to the ON position (Engine off).
• Measure voltage between generator terminal D (wiring harness-side) and body ground.
• Is the voltage B+?
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Yes
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Repair or replace the wiring harness for short to power supply, then go to Step 8.
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No
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Go to Step 8.
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7
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INSPECT GENERATOR CONTROL TERMINAL FOR SHORT TO POWER
• Measure voltage between generator terminal D (part-side) and body ground.
• Is the voltage B+?
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Yes
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Repair or replace generator, then go to the next step.
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No
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Go to the next step.
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8
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VERIFY THAT DTC B1317 TROUBLESHOOTING IS COMPLETED
• Make sure to reconnect all disconnected connectors.
• Clear DTC from PCM memory using M-MDS.
• Run the vehicle under the FREEZE FRAME DATA stored condition.
• Is the same DTC present?
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Yes
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Replace the Fuel additive control module, then go to the next step.
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No
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Go to the next step.
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9
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VERIFY AFTER REPAIR PROCEDURE
• Perform the after repair procedure.
• Are any DTCs present?
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Yes
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Go to the applicable DTC inspection.
(See DTC TABLE [MZ-CD 1.6 (Y6)].)
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No
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DTC troubleshooting completed.
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